Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201717-521
Streets; improvement; railways; duty to pave.

Any street or other railway company, occupying with any track any street, avenue, or alley or portion thereof, which may be ordered paved, repaved, macadamized, or graveled, may be charged with the expense of such improvement of such portion of such street, avenue, or alley so occupied by it between its tracks, between its rails, and for one foot beyond the outer rails; and the cost of such improvement may be collected and enforced against such company in such manner as may be provided by ordinance; or the mayor and city council or village board of trustees may by ordinance require such company to pave, repave, macadamize, or gravel such portion of such street, avenue, or alley occupied by such tracks and for one foot beyond its outside rails.

Laws 1909, c. 22, § 1, p. 194;

Laws 1911, c. 21, § 1, p. 141;

R.S.1913, § 5110;

Laws 1915, c. 92, § 1, p. 234;

Laws 1917, c. 102, § 1, p. 270;

Laws 1919, c. 50, § 1, p. 148;

C.S.1922, § 4283;

Laws 1923, c. 135, § 1, p. 334;

Laws 1927, c. 42, § 1, p. 181;

C.S.1929, § 17-432;

Laws 1933, c. 136, § 20, p. 534;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 17-432;

R.S.1943, § 17-521;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 138.
August 24, 2017